Mississippi, session 2026, HB163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is established the Hope and Opportunity Pathways through Education (HOPE) Program.  The State Department of Education shall implement and administer the HOPE Program.  The goal of the HOPE Program is to develop a comprehensive system in this state to reenroll significant numbers of high school dropouts in programs that will enable them to earn their high school diploma. (2)  Through the HOPE Program, the State Department of Education shall award grants, subject to appropriation for this purpose, to school districts to assist in establishing instructional programs and other services designed to reenroll high school dropouts. The HOPE Program may provide incentive grant funds for a school district to develop partnerships with other school districts, public community colleges and community groups to build comprehensive plans to reenroll high school dropouts in their regions or districts. Programs funded through the HOPE Program must allow high school dropouts, up to and including persons twenty-one (21) years of age, to re-enroll in an educational program in conformance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education.  Programs may include, without limitation, comprehensive yearround programming, evening school, summer school, community college courses, adult education, vocational training, work experience, programs to enhance self-concept and parenting courses.  Any student in the HOPE Program who wishes to earn a high school diploma must meet the prerequisites to receiving a high school diploma and any other graduation requirements of the student's school district of residence. Any student who successfully completes the requirements for his or her graduation must be awarded a diploma identifying the student as graduating from his or her school district of residence. (3)  In order to be eligible for funding under the HOPE Program, a school district must develop a HOPE Plan to be approved by the State Board of Education.  The State Board of Education shall develop rules for the HOPE Program which set forth the requirements for the development of the HOPE Plan.  Each plan must involve school districts, public community colleges and key community programs that work with high school dropouts.  No HOPE Program funds may be distributed to a school district until the State Board of Education approves the plan. (4)  A school district may operate its own program funded by the HOPE Program or enter into a contract for the operation of the program by other not-for-profit entities, including other school districts, public community colleges and notforprofit communitybased organizations. A school district that receives a HOPE grant from the State Department of Education may provide funds under a subgrant, as specified in the HOPE Plan, to other notfor-profit entities to provide services according to the HOPE Plan that was developed. These other entities may include other school districts, public community colleges, notforprofit community-based organizations or a cooperative partnership among these entities. (5)  In order to ensure the delivery of programs that will have the greatest impact, HOPE Program funding must be distributed based upon the proportion of dropouts in the school district to the total number of dropouts in this state.  This formula must employ the dropout data provided by school districts to the State Board of Education. A school district may include those students enrolled in a program funded by the HOPE Program in the district's average daily attendance under the adequate education program if the State Board of Education has approved the HOPE Plan and the students are receiving services that are meeting the requirements for receipt of a high school diploma and otherwise are eligible to be included in the district's average daily attendance for adequate education program funding. (6)  Categories of programming in the HOPE Program may include the following: (a)  Fulltime programs that are comprehensive, year-round programs; (b)  Parttime programs combining work and study scheduled at various times which are flexible to the needs of students; (c)  Online programs and courses in which students take courses and complete onsite, supervised tests that measure each student's mastery of a specific course needed for graduation. Students may take courses online and earn credit, or students may prepare to take supervised tests for specific courses for credit leading to receipt of a high school diploma; and (d)  Dual enrollment in which students attend high school classes in combination with community college classes or students attend community college classes while simultaneously earning high school credit and eventually a high school diploma. (7)  In order to have successful comprehensive programs re-enrolling and graduating low-skilled high school dropouts, programs funded through the HOPE Program must include all of the following components: (a)  Small programs, ideally seventy (70) to one hundred (100) students, at a separate school site with a distinct identity.  Programs may be larger with specific need and justification, keeping in mind that it is crucial to keep programs small to be effective; (b)  Specific performance-based goals and outcomes and measures of enrollment, attendance, skills, credits, graduation, and the transition to college, training and employment; (c)  Strong, experienced leadership and teaching staff who are provided with ongoing professional development; (d)  Voluntary enrollment; (e)  High standards for student learning, integrating work experience, and education, including during the school year and after school, and summer school programs that link internships, work and learning; (f)  Comprehensive programs providing extensive support services; (g)  Small teams of students supported by fulltime paid mentors who work to retain and help those students graduate; (h)  A comprehensive technology learning center with Internet access and broad-based curriculum focusing on academic and career subject areas; and (i)  Learning opportunities that incorporate action into study. (8)  Programs funded through the HOPE Program must report data to the State Board of Education as requested.  This information may include, but is not limited to, student enrollment figures, attendance information, course completion data, graduation information and postgraduation information, as available. (9)  The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations setting forth the funding distribution process to school districts, the planning and the conditions upon which a HOPE Plan will be approved by the board, and other rules and regulations as necessary to develop the HOPE Program. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.